Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.030

State or national bank to resulting state bank—Law applicable to nationals.

This section is applicable where there is to be a resulting state bank.

Upon approval by the director, state or national banks may be merged to result in a state bank, or a national bank may convert into a state bank as hereafter prescribed, except that the action by a national bank shall be taken in the manner prescribed by and shall be subject to limitations and requirements imposed by the law of the United States which shall also govern the rights of its dissenting shareholders.

[ 1994 c 92 s 142; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.030. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.49.030.]